District of Columbia statutes.
46-356.15

Jurisdiction to modify child-support order of foreign country.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in § 46-357.11, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child-support order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of the District may assume jurisdiction to modify the child-support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether the consent to modification of a child-support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to § 46-356.11 has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of the District or of the foreign country.

(b)

An order issued by a tribunal of the District modifying a foreign child-support order pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 615, 63 DCR 222